Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2331.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Injuries At Warehouse Distribution Centers Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Annual injury rate." A metric to measure the injury rate at an employer during the course of the calendar year and reported to the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics' Injuries, Illnesses, and Fatalities program."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.123456789101112131415161718 "Employee." An individual who is employed and performs work tasks at a warehouse distribution center."Employer." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 103 of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act."Injury rate." Metrics that quantify the number of fatalities and rates of injuries and illnesses per 100 full-time employees in warehousing and storage."Warehouse distribution center." An entity engaged in activities as defined by the North American Industry Classification System under the following codes:(1) 423 Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods.(2) 424 Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods.(3) 493 Warehousing and Storage.(4) 4921 Couriers and Express Delivery Services.Section 3. Investigation.(a) Duty to investigate.--If a warehouse distribution center reports to the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and the department an annual injury rate 30% or higher than the average annual injury rate for warehouse distribution centers as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics' Injuries, Illnesses, and Fatalities program, the department shall conduct an investigation. When conducting an investigation, the department may:(1) Consolidate complaints as deemed appropriate by the department.(2) Enter and inspect a warehouse distribution center.(3) Request or subpoena records as the department may deem appropriate or necessary.(4) Interview employees for the purposes of determining 20260HB2331PN3105 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether an employer is in compliance with the laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Notification to the employer.--The department shall issue a notice to inform the employer of the investigation.(c) Notification to employees.--An employer shall provide written and electronic notifications to each employee that the department is conducting an investigation.Section 4. Penalties.(a) Violation penalties.--An employer that has an annual injury rate of 30% or higher shall be subject to the following civil penalties:(1) Not less than $6,250 for the first violation.(2) Not more than $12,500 for the second violation.(3) Not more than $25,000 for the third or subsequent violation.(b) Administrative agency law.--This section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5. Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 5. Powers and duties.(a) Regulations.--The department may promulgate and enforce regulations consistent with this act.(b) Prosecution.--The Office of Attorney General may prosecute civil or criminal actions under this act.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2331PN3105 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526